Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB442.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 817. Pharmaceutical Collection Sites Educational Program.--The Pharmaceutical Collection Sites Educational Program is established within the Department of State. The program shall assist, as requested, in the State Board of Pharmacy's efforts to educate pharmacies on pharmacies' ability to modify their registration with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration under 21 U.S.C. §§ 822(g) (relating to persons required to register) and 828(b) (relating to order forms) and 21 CFR 1301.51 (relating to modification in registration) to receive and destroy mail-back packages and to install, manage and maintain collection receptacles for prescription drugs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0442PN0420 - 2 - 12345678910111213